Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 12. PRACTICES AND TRADES RELATED TO WATER, HEALTH, AND SAFETY

SUBTITLE B. PRACTICES RELATED TO HEALTH AND SAFETY

CHAPTER 1952. CODE ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1952.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Code enforcement" means the inspection of public or private premises for the purpose of:

(A) identifying environmental hazards, including:

(i) fire or health hazards;

(ii) nuisance violations;

(iii) unsafe building conditions; and

(iv) violations of any fire, health, or building regulation, statute, or ordinance; and

(B) improving and rehabilitating those premises with regard to those hazards.

(2) "Code enforcement officer" means an agent of this state or a political subdivision of this state who engages in code enforcement.

(2-a) "Commission" means the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation.

(3) "Department" means the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation.

(4) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.227, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.254, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 1952.002. EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION. A person is not required to be registered under this chapter if the person:

(1) is required to be licensed or registered under another law of this state; and

(2) engages in code enforcement under that license or registration.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1952.003. EMPLOYMENT OF REGISTERED PERSON NOT REQUIRED. This state or a political subdivision of this state may engage in code enforcement without employing a person registered under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1952.051. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The executive director shall administer and enforce this chapter.

(b) The commission by rule shall adopt standards and education requirements consistent with those established under Chapter 654, Government Code, for the registration of:

(1) code enforcement officers; and

(2) code enforcement officers in training.

(c) The education requirements adopted under Subsection (b) must include education regarding the principles and procedures to be followed when possessing or carrying an instrument used specifically for deterring an animal bite.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.229, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.256, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1126 (H.B. 2584), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1952.055. ADVISORY COMMITTEE. The department may establish an advisory committee to provide advice and recommendations to the department on technical matters relevant to the administration of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.258, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1952.101. REGISTRATION REQUIRED. Except as permitted by Section 1952.002, a person may not claim to be a code enforcement officer or use the title "code enforcement officer" unless the person holds a certificate of registration under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1952.102. ELIGIBILITY TO REGISTER AS CODE ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. To be eligible to receive a certificate of registration as a code enforcement officer, a person must:

(1) submit an application in the manner and on the form prescribed by the executive director;

(2) have at least one year of full-time experience in the field of code enforcement;

(3) pass the examination required by the department;

(4) pay the application, examination, and registration fees; and

(5) meet any other requirements prescribed by this chapter or by commission rule.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.232, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.259, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 1952.103. ELIGIBILITY TO REGISTER AS CODE ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN TRAINING. (a) An applicant for a certificate of registration under this chapter who has less than one year of full-time experience in code enforcement is entitled to receive a certificate of registration as a code enforcement officer in training on:

(1) passing the examination described by Section 1952.102(3);

(2) paying the required fees; and

(3) meeting any other requirement prescribed by this chapter or by commission rule.

(b) A certificate issued under this section expires on the first anniversary of the date of issuance.

(c) A code enforcement officer in training may engage in code enforcement under the supervision of a registered code enforcement officer.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.260, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 1952.104. RECIPROCAL REGISTRATION. On proper application, the department shall issue a certificate of registration to a license holder or registrant of another state that has requirements for the licensing or registration of a code enforcement officer that are at least equivalent to those of this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1952.105. TERM OF CERTIFICATE; RENEWAL. (a) A certificate of registration issued under this chapter expires on the second anniversary of the date of issuance and may be renewed biennially on payment of the required renewal fee and on completion of the continuing education requirements prescribed by commission rule.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.298(24), eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.452(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.233, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.261, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.262, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.298(24), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 1952.106. STATEWIDE VALIDITY OF CERTIFICATE; NONTRANSFERABILITY. (a) A certificate of registration issued under this chapter is valid throughout this state.

(b) A certificate of registration issued under this chapter is not assignable or transferable.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER D. CERTIFICATE DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY ACTION

Sec. 1952.151. DENIAL OF CERTIFICATE; DISCIPLINARY ACTION. (a) The commission or executive director may deny a person's application for a certificate of registration if the person's certificate or license to engage in code enforcement or a related profession has been revoked by another licensing entity in this state or another state for:

(1) unprofessional conduct;

(2) fraud, deceit, or negligence; or

(3) misconduct in the practice of code enforcement or a related profession.

(b) The commission or executive director shall suspend or revoke a certificate of registration issued under this chapter if the commission or executive director determines that the certificate holder:

(1) engaged in fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate; or

(2) is grossly negligent, incompetent, or guilty of misconduct in the practice of code enforcement.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.264, eff. September 1, 2017.